Washington statutes.
RCW 19.310.150

Violation of chapter—Civil suit—Damages.

(1) A person who violates this chapter is subject to civil suit in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) Damages awarded to a current client for a civil suit filed for a violation of the requirements under RCW 19.310.040 include treble damages and attorneys' fees.

[ 2012 c 34 s 5; 2009 c 70 s 16.]

NOTES:

Findings—2012 c 34: See note following RCW 19.310.040.